New Jersey, session 221, A3697.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is appropriated to the State Agriculture Development Committee the sum of $500,000, in the following subtotal amounts, listed in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, for the purpose of providing a municipal planning incentive grant pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1999, c.180 (C.4:1C-43.1) and as approved as eligible for such funding pursuant to subsection b. of this section: (1)   $200,000 from dedicated corporation business tax revenues available, pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution, in the Preserve New Jersey Farmland Preservation Fund, established pursuant to section 8 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-50); and (2)   $300,000 from the 2009 Farmland Preservation Fund, established pursuant to section 18 of the Green Acres, Water Supply and Floodplain Protection, and Farmland and Historic Preservation Bond Act of 2009, P.L.2009, c.117, made available due to the reallocation of previously appropriated funds. b.    The following municipality is eligible for funding, in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Agriculture Development Committee providing for a municipal planning incentive grant program, with the monies appropriated pursuant to subsection a. of this section: Municipality Washington Twp County Warren Amount of Grant $500,000 TOTAL $500,000 c.     (1) The following municipality is eligible for funding, in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Agriculture Development Committee providing for a municipal planning incentive grant program competitive grant fund, with the monies appropriated pursuant to P.L.2019, c.450 and P.L.2020, c.139: Municipality County Washington Twp Warren (2)   The maximum grant award that a municipality identified in this subsection may receive, pursuant to this section, shall be $1,000,000, including up to $500,000 in competitive funds approved pursuant to P.L.2019, c.450, and up to $500,000 in competitive funds approved pursuant to P.L.2020, c.139. 2.    There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Preserve New Jersey Farmland Preservation Fund, established pursuant to section 8 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-50), the sum of $200,000 to implement the provisions of this act. 3.    The expenditure of the sums appropriated by this act is subject to the provisions and conditions of P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.), P.L.2009, c.117, P.L.1999, c.180 (C.4:1C-43.1), P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.), and P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-11 et seq.), as appropriate. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.